Florida, session 2026, HB135.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (1) of section 83.803, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
83.803 Definitions.—As used in ss. 83.801-83.809:
(1) "Last known address" means the street address or post
office box address provided by the tenant in the latest rental
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb135-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 135 2026
agreement or, subject to any requirement in the rental
agreement, in a subsequent written change-of-address notice
provided by hand delivery, first-class mail, or e-mail.
Section 2. Subsections (1) and (4) of section 83.806,
Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
83.806 Enforcement of lien.—An owner's lien as provided in
s. 83.805 may be satisfied as follows:
(1) The owner must notify the tenant and any alternate
contact tenant shall be notified by written notice delivered in
person, by e-mail, or by first-class mail with a certificate of
mailing to the tenant's and, if applicable, the alternate
contact's last known address and conspicuously posted at the
self-service storage facility or on the self-contained storage
unit. If the owner sends notice of a pending sale of property to
the tenant's last known e-mail address and does not receive a
response, return receipt, or delivery confirmation from the same
e-mail address, the owner must send notice of the sale to the
tenant by first-class mail with a certificate of mailing to the
tenant's last known address before proceeding with the sale.
(4) After the expiration of the time given in the notice,
an advertisement of the sale or other disposition must shall be
published once a week for 2 consecutive weeks in a newspaper of
general circulation in the area where the self-service storage
facility or self-contained storage unit is located or on a
public website that customarily conducts or advertises personal
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb135-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 135 2026
property auctions or sales.
(a) A lien sale may be conducted on a public website that
customarily conducts personal property auctions or sales. The
facility or unit owner is not required to hold a license to post
property for online sale. Inasmuch As any sale may involve
property of more than one tenant, a single advertisement may be
used to dispose of property at any one sale.
(b) The advertisement must shall include:
1. A brief and general description of what is believed to
constitute the personal property contained in the storage unit,
as provided in paragraph (2)(b).
2. The address of the self-service storage facility or the
address where the self-contained storage unit is located and the
name of the tenant.
3. The time, place, and manner of the sale or other
disposition. The sale or other disposition must shall take place
at least 15 days after the first publication.
(c) If there is no newspaper of general circulation in the
area where the self-service storage facility or self-contained
storage unit is located, the advertisement must shall be posted
at least 10 days before the date of the sale or other
disposition in at least three conspicuous places in the
neighborhood where the self-service storage facility or self-
contained storage unit is located.
Section 3. Subsection (4) is added to section 83.808,
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb135-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 135 2026
Florida Statutes, to read:
83.808 Contracts.—
(4) Rental agreements entered into on or after October 1,
2026, must contain a provision that apprises the tenant of the
option to designate an alternate contact to receive notices
required by the Self-storage Facility Act and must provide space
in the agreement to designate the alternate contact.
(a) Failure or refusal of a tenant to designate an
alternate contact does not affect a tenant's or an owner's
rights or remedies under this section or under any other law.
The alternate contact, if any, may not have any rights to access
the tenant's storage space at a self-service storage facility or
the tenant's self-contained storage unit or the personal
property contained therein unless expressly stated otherwise in
the rental agreement.
(b) For rental agreements entered into before October 1,
2026, an owner may send notice to the tenant's last known
address to apprise the tenant of his or her right to designate
an alternate contact by the method specified by the owner in the
notice.
Section 4. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb135-00